Massachusetts, session 194th, H2924.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 94 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by striking out the words “the care, supervision or custody of”, in line 10, and 
inserting in place thereof the following words:- “contact with”.